Utah statutes.
32B-10-703.   Health care facility exemption.

(1) (a)  This Subsection (1) applies to a health care facility that administers or allows to be administered an alcoholic product to a patient of the health care facility if the alcoholic product is prescribed by a person licensed by the state to write a prescription.

(b)  A health care facility described in Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  is not in violation of this title; and

(ii)  is not required to hold a license or special use permit to make or allow the administration of an alcoholic product.

(2)  This exemption does not apply to an alcoholic product purchased by a health care facility for administration to a patient or a use other than one stated in Subsection (1).

